California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) Regulation of land use and related activities that threaten the integrity of the delta’s resources can best be advanced through comprehensive regional land use planning implemented through reliance on local government in its local land use planning procedures and enforcement.

(b) In order to protect regional, state, and national interests in the long-term agricultural productivity, economic vitality, and ecological health of delta resources, it is important that there be a coordination and integration of activities by the various agencies whose land use activities and decisions cumulatively impact the delta.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29710.

The Legislature further finds and declares that agricultural, recreational, and other uses of the delta can best be protected by implementing projects that protect wildlife habitat before conflicts arise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29711.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the inland ports of Sacramento and Stockton constitute economic and water dependent resources of statewide significance, fulfill essential functions in the maritime industry, and have long been dedicated to transportation, agricultural, commercial, industrial, manufacturing, and navigation uses consistent with federal, state, and local regulations, and that those uses should be maintained and enhanced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29712.

The Legislature further finds and declares as follows:

(a) The delta’s waterways and marinas offer recreational opportunities of statewide and local significance and are a source of economic benefit to the region, and, due to increased demand and usage, there are public safety problems associated with that usage requiring increased coordination by all levels of government.

(b) Recreational boating within the delta is of statewide and local significance and is a source of economic benefit to the region, and to the extent of any conflict or inconsistency between this division and any provisions of the Harbors and Navigation Code, regarding regulating the operation or use of boating in the delta, the provisions of the Harbors and Navigation Code shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29713.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the voluntary acquisition of wildlife and agricultural conservation easements in the delta promotes and enhances the traditional delta values of agriculture, habitat, and recreation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29714.

The Legislature further finds and declares that, in enacting this division, it is not the intent of the Legislature to authorize any governmental agency acting pursuant to this division to exercise their power in a manner which will take or damage private property for public use, without the payment of just compensation therefor. This section is not intended to increase or decrease the rights of any owner of property under the California Constitution or the United States Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29715.

To the extent of any conflict or inconsistency between this division and any provision of the Water Code, the provisions of the Water Code shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29716.

Nothing in this division authorizes the commission to exercise any jurisdiction over matters within the jurisdiction of, or to carry out its powers and duties in conflict with the powers and duties of, any other state agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [29720. - 29734.]

29720.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29720.5.

“Aggrieved person” has the same meaning as defined in Section 29117.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29721.

“Commission” means the Delta Protection Commission created by Section 29735.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29722.

“Delta” means the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta, as defined in Section 12220 of the Water Code, for all provisions of this division, other than Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29735). For the purposes of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29735), “delta” means the area of the delta minus the area contained in Alameda County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29722.5.

“Delta Plan” means the plan adopted by the Delta Stewardship Council pursuant to Section 85300 of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 3.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29722.7.

“Economic sustainability plan” means the plan adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 29759.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 4.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29723.

(a) “Development” means on, in, over, or under land or water, the placement or erection of any solid material or structure; discharge of any dredged material or of any gaseous, liquid, solid, or thermal waste; grading, removing, dredging, mining, or extraction of any materials; change in the density or intensity of use of land, including, but not limited to, subdivisions pursuant to the Subdivision Map Act (Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code), and any other division of land including lot splits, except where the land division is brought about in connection with the purchase of the land by a public agency for public recreational or fish and wildlife uses or preservation; construction, reconstruction, demolition, or alteration of the size of any structure, including any facility of any private, public, or municipal utility; and the removal or harvesting of major vegetation other than for agricultural purposes.

(b) “Development” does not include any of the following:

(1) All farming and ranching activities, as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 3482.5 of the Civil Code.

(2) The maintenance, including the reconstruction of damaged parts, of structures, such as marinas, dikes, dams, levees, riprap (consistent with Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 12306) of Part 4.8 of Division 6 of the Water Code), breakwater, causeways, bridges, ferries, bridge abutments, docks, berths, and boat sheds. “Maintenance” includes, for this purpose, the rehabilitation and reconstruction of levees to meet applicable standards of the United States Army Corps of Engineers or the Department of Water Resources.

(3) The construction, repair, or maintenance of farm dwellings, buildings, stock ponds, irrigation or drainage ditches, water wells, or siphons, including those structures and uses permitted under the California Land Conservation Act of 1965 (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 51200) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(4) The construction or maintenance of farm roads, or temporary roads for moving farm equipment.

(5) The dredging or discharging of dredged materials, including maintenance dredging or removal, as engaged in by any marina, port, or reclamation district, in conjunction with the normal scope of their customary operations, consistent with existing federal, state, and local laws.

(6) The replacement or repair of pilings in marinas, ports, and diversion facilities.

(7) Projects within port districts, including, but not limited to, projects for the movement, grading, and removal of bulk materials for the purpose of activities related to maritime commerce and navigation.

(8) The planning, approval, construction, operation, maintenance, reconstruction, alteration, or removal by a state agency or local agency of any water supply facilities or mitigation or enhancement activities undertaken in connection therewith.

(9) Construction, reconstruction, demolition, and land divisions within existing zoning entitlements, and development within, or adjacent to, the unincorporated towns of the delta, as permitted in the Delta Area Community Plan of Sacramento County and the general plan of Yolo County, authorized prior to January 1, 1992.

(10) Exploration or extraction of gas and hydrocarbons.

(11) The planning, approval, construction, repair, replacement, alteration, reconstruction, operation, maintenance, or removal of oxidation and water treatment facilities owned by the City of Stockton or the City of Lodi, or facilities owned by any local agency within or adjacent to the unincorporated towns of the delta consistent with the general plan of the County of Sacramento or the County of Yolo, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29724.

“Local agency” means any local agency, other than a local government, formed pursuant to general law or special act for the local performance of governmental or proprietary functions within limited boundaries or which maintains facilities within the delta. “Local agency” includes, but is not limited to, a port, water agency, flood control district, county service area, maintenance district or area, improvement district or improvement area, mosquito abatement district, resource conservation district, irrigation district, reclamation district, sanitary or sewer district, or any other zone or area, formed for the purpose of designating an area within which either an assessment or a property tax rate will be levied to pay for a service or improvement benefiting that area or a special function will be carried out within that area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29725.

“Local government” means the Counties of Contra Costa, Sacramento, San Joaquin, Solano, and Yolo, and the Cities of Sacramento, Stockton, Tracy, Antioch, Pittsburg, Isleton, Lathrop, Brentwood, West Sacramento, and Oakley, and any other cities that may be incorporated in the future in the primary zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 39, Sec. 1.   (AB 1677)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

29726.

“Pacific Flyway” means the identified migratory bird flight path, including feeding and nesting habitat, as described in the Central Valley Habitat Joint Venture component of the North American Waterfowl Management Plan (NAWMP-1986).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29727.

“Port” means the Port of Sacramento and the Port of Stockton, including all the land owned or leased by those ports, or potential sites identified in the Delta county general plans as of January 1, 2010, and otherwise authorized by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 6.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29728.

“Primary zone” means the delta land and water area of primary state concern and statewide significance which is situated within the boundaries of the delta, as described in Section 12220 of the Water Code, but that is not within either the urban limit line or sphere of influence line of any local government’s general plan or currently existing studies, as of January 1, 1992. The precise boundary lines of the primary zone includes the land and water areas as shown on the map titled “Delta Protection Zones” on file with the State Lands Commission. Where the boundary between the primary zone and secondary zone is a river, stream, channel, or waterway, the boundary line shall be the middle of that river, stream, channel, or waterway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

29728.5.

“Resources management plan” means the plan adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 29760.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 7.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29730.

“Restoration” means actions which return a degraded or deteriorated area to a level of increased productivity, environmental quality, or beneficial values.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29731.

“Secondary zone” means all the delta land and water area within the boundaries of the delta not included within the primary zone, subject to the land use authority of local government, and that includes the land and water areas as shown on the map titled “Delta Protection Zones” on file with the State Lands Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

29732.

“Sphere of influence line” refers to those boundaries of local governments as defined in Sections 56425 and 56426 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29733.

“Unincorporated towns” means the communities of Walnut Grove, Clarksburg, Courtland, Hood, Locke, Knightsen, Collinsville, and Ryde.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 8.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29734.

“Urban limit line” means that general plan line established and approved by any local government within the delta which delineates boundaries beyond which urban development is not publicly proposed by local government, as of January 1, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Organization [29735. - 29741.]

29735.

There is hereby created the Delta Protection Commission consisting of 15 members as follows:

(a) One member of the board of supervisors, or his or her designee, of each of the five counties within the Delta whose supervisorial district is within the primary zone shall be appointed by the board of supervisors of each of those respective counties.

(b) (1) Two elected city council members shall be selected and appointed by city selection committees, from the appropriate regions specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B), one in each of the following areas:

(A) One from the
 south Delta, consisting of the County of San Joaquin.

(B) One from the west Delta, from either the County of Contra Costa or the County of Solano, on a rotating basis.

(2) One elected city council member shall be selected and appointed by city selection committees, from regional and area councils of government from the north Delta, consisting of the Counties of Yolo and Sacramento.

(3) A city council member appointed pursuant to this subdivision may select a designee for purposes of this subdivision.

(4) Notwithstanding Section 29736, the term of office of the members selected pursuant to this subdivision shall be two years.

(c) One member each from the board of directors of three different reclamation districts that are located within the primary zone who are residents of the Delta, and who are elected by the trustees of reclamation districts pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2), and (3). Each reclamation district may nominate one director to be a member. The member from an area described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) shall be selected from among the nominees by a majority vote of the reclamation districts in that area. A member selected pursuant to this subdivision may select a designee for this purpose. For the purposes of this section, each reclamation district shall have one vote. Reclamation district members shall consist of the following:

(1) One member from the area of the North Delta Water
 Agency as described in Section 9.1 of the North Delta Water Agency Act (Chapter 283 of the Statutes of 1973).

(2) One member from an area including the west Delta consisting of the area of the County of Contra Costa within the
 Delta and within the Central Delta Water Agency as described in Section 9.1 of the Central Delta Water Agency Act (Chapter 1133 of the Statutes of 1973).

(3) One member from the area of the South Delta Water Agency as described in Section 9.1 of the South Delta Water Agency Act (Chapter 1089 of the Statutes of 1973).

(d) The Secretary of Food and Agriculture, or the secretary’s sole designee.

(e) The executive officer of the State Lands Commission, or the executive officer’s sole designee.

(f) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, or his or her sole designee.

(g) The
 Secretary of Transportation, or his or her sole designee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 486.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

29735.1.

(a) A member of the commission described in subdivision (a) of Section 29735 may, subject to the confirmation of his or her appointing power, appoint an alternate to represent him or her at a commission meeting. An alternate may serve prior to confirmation for a period not to exceed 90 days from the date of appointment, unless and until confirmation is denied.

(b) The alternate shall serve at the pleasure of the member who appoints him or her and shall have all of the powers and duties of a member of the commission, except that the alternate shall only participate and vote in a meeting in the absence of the member who appoints him or her. All provisions of law relating to conflicts
 of interest that are applicable to a member shall apply to an alternate. If a member has, or is known to have, a conflict of interest on any matter, the member’s alternate is ineligible to vote on that matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 10.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29736.

The appointed members of the commission shall serve at the pleasure of their appointing entities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 12.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29737.

Members shall serve without compensation, but the expenses of each member incurred in connection with official duties shall be paid by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29738.

The office of an appointed member of the commission is vacated upon the loss of any qualification required for appointment, and in that event the appointing authority shall appoint a successor within 30 days of the occurrence of the vacancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 13.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29739.

(a) The commission, during the first meeting of the commission after January 1, 2010, shall elect from among the members identified in subdivision (a) of Section 29735 a chairperson who shall serve for one year.

(b) Subsequent chairpersons shall serve for two years and shall be elected from among the members identified in subdivision (a) of Section 29735.

(c) The chairperson shall serve as a voting member of the Delta Stewardship Council.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 15.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29740.

One nonvoting member who shall be a Member of the Senate, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and one nonvoting member who shall be a Member of the Assembly, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, both of whom represent areas within the primary zone, shall meet with, and participate in the activities of, the commission to the extent that the participation is not incompatible with their respective positions as Members of the Legislature. For the purpose of this division, those Members of the Legislature shall constitute a joint interim investigating committee on the subject of this division, and as such shall have the powers and duties imposed upon those committees by the Joint Rules of the Senate and Assembly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29741.

The time and place of the first meeting of the commission, on and after January 1, 2010, shall be prescribed by the Governor, but in no event shall it be scheduled for a date later than January 31, 2010. All meetings after the first meeting shall be held in a city within the Delta.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 16.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [29750. - 29759.]

29750.

The commission shall meet at least bimonthly. All meetings shall be open to the public as required by law. Notice of the time and place of all regular and special meetings shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation whose area of circulation is throughout the delta. Notice of any meeting shall be published at least seven days prior to the meeting date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 568, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

29751.

A majority of the voting members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the business of the commission. A majority vote of the voting membership shall be required to take action with respect to any matter unless otherwise specified in this division. The vote of each member shall be individually recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 17.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29752.

The commission shall adopt its own rules, regulations, and procedures necessary for its organization and operation, and shall conduct its meetings in compliance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 18.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29753.

(a) The commission shall appoint at least one advisory committee to provide recommendations regarding the diverse interests within the Delta. At a minimum, the advisory committees shall include representatives of state agencies and other stakeholders with interests in the Delta’s ecosystem, water supply, and socioeconomic sustainability, including, but not limited to, its recreational, agricultural, flood control, environmental, and water resources, and state, local, and utility infrastructure. The commission shall encourage participation of various federal agencies, including the United States Bureau of Reclamation, the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, the United States Army Corps of Engineers, and others as appropriate.

(b) The commission may appoint committees from its membership or may appoint additional advisory committees from members of other interested public agencies and private groups.

(c) The commission shall seek advice and recommendations from advisory committees appointed by local government that are involved in subject matters affecting the Delta.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 20.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29754.

The commission shall establish and maintain an office within the Delta or the City of Rio Vista, and for this purpose the commission may rent or own property and equipment. Any rule, regulation, procedure, plan, or other record of the commission that constitutes a public record under state law shall be available for inspection and copying pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 388.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

29755.

The commission shall appoint, and fix the salary of, an executive director who shall have charge of administering the affairs of the commission, including entering into contracts, subject to the directions and policies of the commission. The executive director shall, subject to the approval of the commission, appoint those employees that are necessary to carry out the functions of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29756.

The commission may promote, facilitate, and administer the acquisition of voluntary private and public wildlife and agricultural conservation easements in the delta.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29756.5.

The commission may act as the facilitating agency for the implementation of any joint habitat restoration or enhancement programs located within the primary zone of the Delta, including, but not limited to, a national heritage area designation in the Delta.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 22.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29757.

The commission may apply for and accept federal grants or other federal funds and receive gifts, donations, rents, royalties, state funds derived from bond sales, the proceeds of taxes or funds from any other state revenue sources, or any other financial support from public or private sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29758.

All members of the commission are subject to Title 9 (commencing with Section 85100) of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29759.

(a) Not later than July 1, 2011, the commission shall prepare and adopt, by a majority vote of the membership of the commission, an economic sustainability plan. The economic sustainability plan shall include information and recommendations that inform the Delta Stewardship Council’s policies regarding the socioeconomic sustainability of the Delta region.

(b) The economic sustainability plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Public safety recommendations, such as flood protection recommendations.

(2) The economic goals, policies, and objectives in
 local general plans and other local economic efforts, including recommendations on continued socioeconomic sustainability of agriculture and its infrastructure and legacy communities in the Delta.

(3) Comments and recommendations to the Department of Water Resources concerning its periodic update of the flood management plan for the Delta.

(4) Identification of ways to encourage recreational investment along the key river corridors, as appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 23.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Resource Management Plan [29760. - 29767.]

29760.

(a) Not later than October 1, 1994, the commission shall prepare and adopt, by a majority vote of the membership of the commission, and thereafter review and maintain, a comprehensive long-term resource management plan for land uses within the primary zone of the delta. The resource management plan shall consist of the map of the primary zone and text or texts setting forth a description of the needs and goals for the delta and a statement of the policies, standards, and elements of the resource management plan.

(b) The resource management plan shall meet the following requirements:

(1) Protect and preserve the cultural values and economic vitality that reflect the history, natural heritage, and human resources of the delta.

(2) Conserve and protect the quality of renewable resources.

(3) Preserve and protect agricultural viability.

(4) Restore, improve, and manage levee systems by promoting strategies, including, but not limited to, methods and procedures which advance the adoption and implementation of coordinated and uniform standards among governmental agencies for the maintenance, repair, and construction of both public and private levees.

(5) Preserve and protect delta dependent fisheries and their habitat.

(6) Preserve and protect riparian and wetlands habitat, and promote and encourage a net increase in both the acreage and values of those resources on public lands and through voluntary cooperative arrangements with private property owners.

(7) Preserve and protect the water quality of the delta, both for instream purposes and for human use and consumption.

(8) Preserve and protect open-space and outdoor recreational opportunities.

(9) Preserve and protect private property interests from trespassing and vandalism.

(10) Preserve and protect opportunities for controlled public access and use of public lands and waterways consistent with the protection of natural resources and private property interests.

(11) Preserve, protect, and maintain navigation.

(12) Protect the delta from any development that results in any significant loss of habitat or agricultural land.

(13) Promote strategies for the funding, acquisition, and maintenance of voluntary cooperative arrangements, such as conservation easements, between property owners and conservation groups that protect wildlife habitat and agricultural land, while not impairing the integrity of levees.

(14) Permit water reservoir and habitat development that is compatible with other uses.

(c) The resource management plan shall not supersede the authority of local governments over areas within the secondary zone.

(d) To facilitate, in part, the requirements specified in paragraphs (8), (9), (10), and (11) of subdivision (b), the commission shall include in the resource management plan, in consultation with all law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction in the delta, a strategy for the implementation of a coordinated marine patrol system throughout the delta that will improve law enforcement and coordinate the use of resources by all jurisdictions to ensure an adequate level of public safety. The strategic plan shall identify resources to implement that coordination. The commission shall have no authority to abrogate the existing authority of any law enforcement agency.

(e) To the extent that any of the requirements specified in this section are in conflict, nothing in this division shall deny the right of the landowner to continue the agricultural use of the land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 584, Sec. 2.7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

29761.

The commission shall adopt, by a majority vote, the economic sustainability plan and each plan update after at least three public hearings, with at least one hearing held in a community in the north Delta, one hearing in the south Delta, and one hearing in the west Delta.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 25.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29761.5.

(a) The commission shall review, and, as determined to be necessary, amend the economic sustainability plan every five years on or before December 31 in years ending in six or one.

(b) The commission shall transmit copies of the economic sustainability plan and any subsequent amendments to the Governor, Legislature, each local government as defined in Section 29725, and Delta Stewardship Council within 60 days of adoption or amendment. Within 180 days of the commission’s adoption or amendment of the economic sustainability plan, the Delta Stewardship Council shall review the economic sustainability plan for consistency with the Delta Plan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 27.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29763.

Within 180 days from the date of the adoption of the resources management plan or any amendments, changes, or updates, to the resources management plan by the commission, each local government shall submit to the commission proposed amendments to its general plan that are intended to make the general plan consistent with the resources management plan with respect to land located within the primary zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 29.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29763.5.

The commission shall act on proposed local government general plan amendments within 60 days from the date of submittal of the proposed amendments. The commission shall approve the proposed general plan amendments by a majority vote of the commission membership, with regard to lands within the primary zone, only after making all of the following written findings as to the potential impact of the proposed amendments, to the extent that those impacts will not increase requirements or restrictions upon agricultural practices in the primary zone, based on substantial evidence in the record:

(a) The general plan, and any development approved or proposed that is consistent with the general plan, are consistent with the resource management plan.

(b) The general plan, and any development approved or proposed that is consistent with the general plan, will not result in wetland or riparian loss.

(c) The general plan, and development approved or proposed that is consistent with the general plan, will not result in the degradation of water quality.

(d) The general plan, and any development approved or proposed that is consistent with the general plan, will not result in increased nonpoint source pollution.

(e) The general plan, and any development approved or proposed that is consistent with the general plan, will not result in the degradation or reduction of Pacific Flyway habitat.

(f) The general plan, and any development approved or proposed that is consistent with the general plan, will not result in reduced public access, provided the access does not infringe on private property rights.

(g) The general plan, and any development approved or proposed that is consistent with the general plan, will not expose the public to increased flood hazard.

(h) The general plan, and any development approved or proposed that is consistent with the general plan, will not adversely impact agricultural lands or increase the potential for vandalism, trespass, or the creation of public or private nuisances on public or private land.

(i) The general plan, and any development approved or proposed that is consistent with the general plan, will not result in the degradation or impairment of levee integrity.

(j) The general plan, and any development approved or proposed that is consistent with the general plan, will not adversely impact navigation.

(k) The general plan, and any development approved or proposed that is consistent with the general plan, will not result in any increased requirements or restrictions upon agricultural practices in the primary zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 584, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

29763.8.

A local government shall adopt its proposed general plan amendments within 120 days after their approval by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1155, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

29764.

Land use authority granted to the commission by this division is limited to the primary zone, and shall not preempt local government general plans for lands within the secondary zone.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 31.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29765.

Prior to the commission approving the general plan amendments of the local government, the local government may approve development within the primary zone only after making all of the following written findings on the basis of substantial evidence in the record:

(a) The development will not result in wetland or riparian loss.

(b) The development will not result in the degradation of water quality.

(c) The development will not result in increased nonpoint source pollution or soil erosion, including subsidence or sedimentation.

(d) The development will not result in degradation or reduction of Pacific Flyway habitat.

(e) The development will not result in reduced public access, provided that access does not infringe upon private property rights.

(f) The development will not expose the public to increased flood hazards.

(g) The development will not adversely impact agricultural lands or increase the potential for vandalism, trespass, or the creation of public or private nuisances on private or public land.

(h) The development will not result in the degradation or impairment of levee integrity.

(i) The development will not adversely impact navigation.

(j) The development will not result in any increased requirements or restrictions upon agricultural practices in the primary zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29766.

Nothing in this division shall deny the right of private or public property owners and local governments to establish agriculture preserves and enter into contracts pursuant to the California Land Conservation Act of 1965 (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 51200) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code) or apply other enforceable restrictions or zoning within the primary zone or the secondary zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29767.

The commission may not exercise the power of eminent domain in implementing the resource management plan, unless requested by the landowner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 584, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Appeal and Judicial Review [29770. - 29773.]

29770.
